Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-315
Rent, defined.

Rent shall include lease, sublease, let, and otherwise grant for consideration the right to occupy premises not owned by the occupant.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 16.